Vermont, session 2025-2026, H360.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 23 V.S.A § 116 is amended to read:
§ 116. ISSUANCE OF MOBILE IDENTIFICATION
(a) Definitions. As used in this section:
(1) “Attribute authentication” means the verification of a specific quality
of a data field on a mobile identification without revealing the underlying data
in that field. Attribute authentication includes verifying that a mobile
VT LEG #380622 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.360
2025 Page 2 of 9
identification holder is legally permitted to purchase an age-restricted item
without revealing the holder’s date of birth or actual age.
(2) “Data field” means a discrete piece of information that appears on a
mobile identification.
(2)(3) “Full profile” means all the information provided on a mobile
identification.
(3)(4) “Limited profile” means a portion of the information provided on
a mobile identification.
(4)(5) “Mobile identification” means an electronic representation of the
information contained on a nonmobile credential.
(5)(6) “Mobile identification holder” means an individual to whom a
mobile identification has been issued.
(6)(7) “Nonmobile credential” means a nondriver identification card
issued under section 115 of this title, a driver’s license issued under section
603 of this title, a junior operator’s license issued under section 602 of this
title, a learner’s permit issued under section 617 of this title, a commercial
driver’s license issued under section 4111 of this title, or a commercial
learner’s permit issued under section 4112 of this title.
(8) “Selective disclosure” means the disclosure through a verification
system of only certain data fields from a mobile identification that are
VT LEG #380622 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.360
2025 Page 3 of 9
reasonably necessary for the purposes of the verification and the ability of the
mobile identification holder to determine which data fields are disclosed.
(b) Issuance. The Commissioner of Motor Vehicles may issue a mobile
identification to an individual in addition to, and not instead of, a nonmobile
credential. If issued, the mobile identification shall:
(1) be capable of producing both a full profile and a limited profile;
(2) satisfy the purpose for which the profile is presented;
(3) allow the mobile identification holder to maintain physical
possession of the device on which the mobile identification is accessed during
verification; and
(4) not be a substitute for an individual producing a nonmobile
credential upon request.
* * *
(d) Administration.
(1) The Commissioner may operate, or may operate through a third-
party administrator, a verification system for mobile identifications.
(2) Access to the verification system and any data field by a person
presented with a mobile identification requires the credential mobile
identification holder’s consent, and, if consent is granted, the Commissioner
may release the following through the verification system:
VT LEG #380622 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.360
2025 Page 4 of 9
(A) for a full profile, all data fields that appear on the mobile
identification; and
(B) for a limited profile, only the data fields represented in the
limited profile for appearing on the mobile identification that the mobile
identification holder has consented to have released.
(3) The Commissioner shall ensure that any verification system for
mobile identifications meets the following requirements:
(A) The verification system does not incentivize or require a person
using the verification system to take possession of a mobile identification
holder’s device while accessing data from the mobile identification.
(B) The verification system does not share or retain any information
regarding the persons that have accessed data from a particular mobile
identification or the locations at which data from a particular mobile
identification has been accessed.
(C) The verification system requires attribute authentication or
selective disclosure in all instances when access to a full profile is not
reasonably necessary. The verification system shall ensure that the data fields
being requested are first disclosed to the mobile identification holder and that
the mobile identification holder may determine which data fields are released
to the person requesting the data.
VT LEG #380622 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.360
2025 Page 5 of 9
(D) The verification system utilizes techniques, methodologies, or
processes that ensure that data obtained from a mobile identification, including
the fact that the verification system was accessed in relation to a specific
mobile identification, cannot be linked together by one or more persons who
access the verification system.
(4)(A) The Commissioner shall adopt standards relating to:
(i) security and communications requirements for devices on
which mobile identifications are stored;
(ii) procedures for requesting and accessing data from mobile
identifications through the verification system;
(iii) minimum requirements for the identification and
authentication of the mobile identification holder prior to obtaining the
identification holder’s consent to the disclosure of data fields on the mobile
identification; and
(iv) requirements providing for the storage of information
regarding what data was requested and accessed from a mobile identification,
which shall only be available to the mobile identification holder and may be
retained or destroyed at the mobile identification holder’s discretion.
(B) The standards, to the extent practicable, shall be based on widely
accepted and publicly available national or international standards.
(e) Privacy protections.
VT LEG #380622 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.360
2025 Page 6 of 9
(1) The verification system and mobile identifications shall not permit
the Department or any State entity to obtain control over the device on which a
mobile identification is stored or to deactivate a mobile identification stored on
a mobile identification holder’s device.
(2) A law enforcement officer shall not take physical possession of the
device on which a mobile identification holder’s mobile identification is
accessed for the purpose of accessing the mobile identification or verifying the
mobile identification holder’s identity.
(3) No person shall request more data from a mobile identification than
is reasonably necessary to determine that the mobile identification holder
meets the legal requirements to enter into the transaction with the person
requesting the data.
(4) No digital services provider, application developer, or administrator
or operator of the verification system shall access, collect, retain, share, or use
data from a mobile identification or data about the use of a mobile
identification, except as necessary to comply with applicable State and federal
law.
(f) Right to choose whether to use mobile identification.
(1) No person shall condition the offer or use of a good or service on
access to an individual’s mobile identification or nonmobile credential except
if:
VT LEG #380622 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.360
2025 Page 7 of 9
(A) the transaction requires proof of age, identity, residency, or
another characteristic pursuant to State or federal law;
(B) the identification or credential is requested in relation to financial
or banking services to ensure that accounts, funds, financial instruments, or
personally identifiable information or financial data is not accessed by an
unauthorized person; or
(C) the identification or credential is requested in relation to medical
services to ensure that goods, services, or private medical information are not
provided to an unauthorized person.
(2) No person shall charge different prices or rates for goods or services,
provide different treatment or quality of goods or services, or condition access
or entry to a location based on whether an individual presents mobile
identification or an appropriate nonmobile credential, unless the use of mobile
identification or an appropriate nonmobile credential is necessary for
conducting a remote transaction or due to circumstances beyond the person’s
control that prevent the person from accessing the verification system.
(g) Enforcement.
(1) The Attorney General or a State’s Attorney may bring an action
against a private entity to enforce the provisions of this section by restraining
prohibited acts, seeking civil penalties, obtaining assurances of discontinuance,
and conducting civil investigations in accordance with the procedures
VT LEG #380622 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.360
2025 Page 8 of 9
established in 9 V.S.A. §§ 2458–2461 as though a violation of the provisions
of this section is an unfair act in commerce. Any person complained against
shall have the same rights and remedies as specified in 9 V.S.A. §§ 2458–
2461. The Superior Courts are authorized to impose the same civil penalties
and investigation costs and to order other relief to the State of Vermont or an
aggrieved individual for violations of this section as they are authorized to
impose or order under the provisions of 9 V.S.A. §§ 2458 and 2461 in an
unfair act in commerce.
(2) An individual who has been aggrieved by a violation of the
provisions of this section may bring a civil action in the Superior Court
seeking:
(A) damages equal to:
(i) for a negligent violation of the provisions of this section,
$2,500.00 or the amount of actual damages, whichever is greater; and
(ii) for an intentional violation of the provisions of this section,
$5,000.00 or the amount of actual damages, whichever is greater;
(B) restraint of prohibited acts;
(C) reasonable attorney’s fees and costs; and
(D) other appropriate relief.
(3) For purposes of enforcing the provisions of this section, a repeated
violation of the provisions of this section by the same person through identical
VT LEG #380622 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.360
2025 Page 9 of 9
use of the same individual’s mobile identification prior to enforcement under
the provisions of this subsection shall not constitute separate violations of the
provisions of this section.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380622 v.1